Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 3

Inventory and Management

30-2-301. Making inventory — Return — Notice to beneficiaries.

The personal representative, within sixty (60) days after entering on the administration of a testate or intestate estate, shall make a complete and accurate inventory of the probate estate of the deceased, and return the inventory to the clerk of the court exercising probate jurisdiction in the county of the estate, and verify it by the personal representative's oath before the clerk or before any person authorized by law to administer oaths in such cases whether within or without the borders of the state. When the will of the deceased excuses the requirement for making and filing an inventory of the estate, or when excused by all of the residuary distributees or legatees, no inventory shall be required of a solvent estate, unless demanded by any residuary distributee or legatee of the estate.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(4), the personal representative, within sixty (60) days after entering on the administration, shall notify:

Each legatee or devisee under the will that that person or entity is a beneficiary by sending, by first class mail or personal delivery, a complete copy of the will to those beneficiaries sharing in the residue of the estate, and by sending a copy of the paragraph or paragraphs of the will containing the bequests to those beneficiaries only receiving bequests; and

Each residuary distributee of an intestate deceased person by sending that person a copy of the letters of administration.

If the residue or a portion thereof is distributable to a trustee for the benefit of others, a complete copy of the will shall be sent to the trustee who shall have the obligation under title 35 to send copies of the will to the trust beneficiaries.

Within the sixty-day period, the personal representative shall also execute and file with the clerk of the court an affidavit that the required copies have been mailed or delivered to the beneficiaries or distributees, and an explanation of efforts to identify and locate beneficiaries or distributees, if any, to whom copies have not yet been sent.

The personal representative shall not be required to comply with the requirements of subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(3) if:

The personal representative and the sole beneficiary of the estate are the same person; or

The decedent's will was admitted to probate in solemn form.

Within the sixty-day period, the personal representative shall execute and file with the clerk of the court an affidavit that the bureau of TennCare has been notified of the decedent's death pursuant to § 71-5-116.

Following expiration of the sixty-day period, specified in subsection (a), a person or entity may file a notice with the clerk's office that provides the name, current mailing address and actual physical address of any legatee or distributee who has not been identified or has not been located by the personal representative. The notice may not be filed prior to the expiration of the sixty-day period.

The person or entity filing notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(6)(A) shall be entitled to a reasonable fee for each legatee or distributee for whom the person or entity filing the notice provides satisfactory proof, as defined in subdivision (b)(6)(C), of the legatee or distributee’s relationship to the decedent.

Other than a reasonable fee, such person or entity shall not be entitled to any other compensation from any person or entity, including any legatee or distributee, for providing the information to the legatee or the distributee or to the clerk.

Such fee shall be determined by the contract between the legatee or distributee and the person or entity filing the notice; provided, however, such fee shall not exceed one-third (1/3) of the legatee or distributee’s interest.

Any contract entered into between a person or entity filing notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(6)(A) and a legatee or distributee prior to the expiration of the sixty-day period specified in subsection (a), shall be null and void and unenforceable in a court of law.

If more than one person or entity submits accurate identifying information to the clerk, then the person or entity that has a contract with the legatee or distributee shall be entitled to the fee provided by this subdivision (b)(6).

For the purposes of this subdivision (b)(6), any one of the following constitutes satisfactory proof of the relationship between the legatee or distributee and the decedent:

An affidavit of pedigree pursuant to § 30-2-711;

An affidavit of heirship pursuant to § 30-2-712;

Vital records establishing the relationship; or

Other proof satisfactory to the court.

Code 1858, § 2241 (deriv. Acts 1723, ch. 10, § 2; 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 1); Shan., § 3977; Code 1932, § 8189; Acts 1957, ch. 34, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-501; Acts 1984, ch. 644, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, §§ 6, 7; 1992, ch. 951, §§ 4, 5; 2006, ch. 639, § 1; 2008, ch. 1050, § 1; 2010, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Administrator appointed to succeed resigning representative, time in which inventory to be taken, § 30-1-113.

Comparison of inventories with tax rolls, § 67-1-1009.

Estate tax, title 67, chapter 8, part 2.

Inheritance taxes, title 67, chapter 8, parts 3-5.

Inventory of safe deposit boxes, § 45-2-905.

Inventory proved incomplete, effect, § 30-2-608.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Tax assessment, filing of return, § 67-5-511.

Tax assessment of property of estate, § 67-5-502.

Theft of property, § 39-14-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 662, 664, 986.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1302 — 4-1304, 4-1401.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Marital Deduction Planning Under the Tax Reform Act of 1976 (Ronald S. Borod, William H. Lawson, Jr., Clayton D. Smith), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (1977).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189 (1978).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

The Tolling of Statutes of Limitations in Tennessee, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375 (1984).

Value definition clauses: The basics (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Surplus campaign funds of deceased candidate for state or local office, OAG 99-118, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 118 (5/14/99).

30-2-302. Recording of inventory.

The clerk shall present the inventory to the court, and, if it appears to be regular, the court shall order it to be recorded in the book of inventories.

Code 1858, § 2242 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 1); Shan., § 3978; Code 1932, § 8190; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 30-502.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 663.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1305.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

30-2-303. Sale of decedent's effects.

Unless otherwise directed by the will and unless the specific personal property is the subject of a bequest, the personal representative of a testate or intestate estate may, in the personal representative's discretion, sell the personal property of the decedent at public or private sale, for cash or on terms, in such manner and for such prices as the personal representative may deem advisable; but the personal representative shall not make a private sale to the personal representative, to business associates, to members of the personal representative's immediate family or to their agents without court approval or the written consent of all residuary distributees of the estate. The personal representative may employ persons or firms to conduct the sale and shall receive credit for all reasonable expenses of the sale in the final accounting.

Code 1858, §§ 2243-2245 (deriv. Acts 1723, ch. 10, § 2; 1797, ch. 7, § 5); Shan., §§ 3979-3981; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8191-8193; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-503 — 30-505; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 12.

Cross-References. Duties of county clerk, § 18-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 722, 724, 725.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1204.

30-2-304. Apportionment of rents upon death of life tenant.

Where a tenant for life of real estate creates a lease out of the tenant's estate for one (1) or more years, and dies before the expiration of the lease, and before the term fixed for the payment of the rent, the rent may be apportioned, and the executor or administrator of the tenant for life may recover of the lessee, pro rata, according to the contract, and for the time the lessee had the use of the property until the death of the tenant for life.

Whenever any person has rented from a life tenant by written contract signed by the life tenant any real estate, adapted to and rented for farming or agricultural purposes, for a period not exceeding one (1) year, and the written contract has been entered into after December 1st of the preceding year, and the life tenant dies after the succeeding January 1st and during the year for which the contract is made, the lessee shall have the right to hold possession of such premises until the end of the year or term as against the remaindermen and all other persons; and in this case the rents on the premises for the year shall be apportioned between the estate of the deceased life tenant and the remainderman as provided by subsection (a).

Acts 1877, ch. 159; 1925, ch. 51, § 1; Shan. Supp., §§ 4184, 4184a1; Code 1932, §§ 8406, 8407; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-506, 30-507.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 626.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 33; 21 Tenn. Juris., Remainders, Reversions and Executory Interests, § 25.

30-2-305. Debts chargeable against all assets.

Every debtor's property, except such as may be specially exempt by law, is assets for the satisfaction of all the debtor's just debts.

Code 1858, § 2252 (deriv. 5 Geo. II, ch. 7, § 4); Shan., § 3985; Code 1932, § 8197; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-508.

Cross-References. Insolvent estates, title 30, ch. 5.

Sale of land to pay debts, title 30, ch. 2, part 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 611, 849, 852.

Law Reviews.

Creditors' Rights and Security Transactions — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 799 (1954).

Insurance Proceeds in Trust (Troy Beatty, Jr.), 28 Tenn. L. Rev. 344 (1961).

Rights of Creditors in Insurance — The Tennessee Exemption Statutes (Paul J. Hartman), 5 Vand. L. Rev. 760 (1952).

30-2-306. Notice to creditors of qualification of personal representative.

Except as provided in subsection (e), it is the duty of the clerk of the court in which an estate is being administered, within thirty (30) days after the issuance of letters testamentary or of administration, to give, in the name of the personal representative of the estate, public notice of the personal representative's qualification as such by two (2) consecutive weekly notices published in some newspaper of the county in which letters testamentary or of administration are granted, or, if no newspaper is published in that county, by written notices posted in three (3) public places in the county, one (1) of which shall be posted at the usual place for posting notices at the courthouse.

The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE TO CREDITORS

Estate of (name of deceased)

Notice is hereby given that on the day of , 20 letters testamentary (or of administration as the case may be) in respect of the estate of (name of deceased) who died , 20 were issued to the undersigned by the court of County, Tennessee. All persons, resident and nonresident, having claims, matured or unmatured, against the estate are required to file the same with the clerk of the above named court on or before the earlier of the dates prescribed in (1) or (2), otherwise their claims will be forever barred:

Four (4) months from the date of the first publication (or posting, as the case may be) of this notice if the creditor received an actual copy of this notice to creditors at least sixty (60) days before the date that is four (4) months from the date of the first publication (or posting); or

Sixty (60) days from the date the creditor received an actual copy of the notice to creditors if the creditor received the copy of the notice less than sixty (60) days prior to the date that is four (4) months from the date of first publication (or posting) as described in (1)(A); or

Twelve (12) months from the decedent's date of death.

This day of , 20 .

Personal Representative

Attorney for the Estate

Clerk

An affidavit of the publisher of the newspaper, in case of publication by newspaper, showing the dates on which the notice was published, or of the personal representative, in case of posted notices, showing the date on which the notice was first posted, shall be prima facie evidence of the publication required by this section. The affidavit shall be filed with the clerk and be noted by the clerk on the docket of the cause.

In addition, it shall be the duty of the personal representative to mail or deliver by other means a copy of the published or posted notice as described in subsection (b) to all creditors of the decedent of whom the personal representative has actual knowledge or who are reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative, at the creditors' last known addresses. This notice shall not be required where a creditor has already filed a claim against the estate, has been paid or has issued a release of all claims against the estate.

The requirement of subsection (a) shall not apply if the letters testamentary or of administration are issued more than one (1) year from the decedent's date of death.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 1; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; 1949, ch. 48, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.1; Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-509; Acts 1989, ch. 395, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 415, § 4; 1997, ch. 426, § 5; 1999, ch. 491, §§ 4, 5; 2005, ch. 429, § 5; 2008, ch. 856, § 1; 2012, ch. 886, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendment by that act to this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 714, 738, 766, 768, 879, 881, 892, 896.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1001.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Constitutional Law — Fourteenth Amendment Right to Due Process — Notice to Estate Creditors Under State Nonclaim Statutes, 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 465 (1989).

Current Problems Facing the Executor Taking the Section 2053 Estate Tax Deduction (Jay D. Christiansen), 30 Vand. L. Rev. 795 (1977).

Decedent's Estates — Bilbrey v. Smithers: Limitations on Post-Death Claims for Purposes of Intestate Succession in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 517 (1997).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

In Rem Actions — Adequacy of Notice, 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 495 (1958).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1353 (1961).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 88-138, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 139 (8/8/88).

30-2-307. Claims against estate — Filing — Amendment.

All claims against the estate arising from a debt of the decedent shall be barred unless filed within the period prescribed in the notice published or posted in accordance with § 30-2-306(b).

Before the date that is twelve (12) months from the decedent's date of death, the court may permit the personal representative to distribute the balance of the estate in accordance with § 30-2-701, make final settlement and enter an order discharging the personal representative. If a creditor files its claim after the estate is closed as permitted in the preceding sentence and before the date that is twelve (12) months from the decedent's date of death, the personal representative shall not be personally liable to the creditor whose recourse will be against the distributees of the estate, each of whom shall share liability on the claim in proportion to the claimant's share of the residue. The burden of proof on any issue as to whether a creditor was known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal representative, or as to whether actual notice was properly sent in accordance with § 30-2-306, shall be upon the creditor claiming entitlement to actual notice. In such cases, the distributees of the estate shall be personally liable on a pro rata basis if the court finds the claim is proper and the creditor did not receive the appropriate notice.

When any claim is evidenced by a written instrument, the instrument or a photocopy of the instrument shall be filed; when due by a judgment or decree, a copy of the judgment or decree certified by the clerk of the court where rendered shall be filed; and when due by open account, an itemized statement of the account shall be filed; and every claim shall be verified by affidavit of the creditor before an officer authorized to administer oaths, which affidavit shall state that the claim is a correct, just and valid obligation of the estate of the decedent, that neither the claimant nor any other person on the claimant's behalf has received payment of the claim, in whole or in part, except such as is credited thereon, and that no security for the claim has been received, except as thereon stated.

No claim shall be filed by the clerk nor deemed to be filed unless submitted in triplicate, but the second and third copies need not be verified.

The clerk shall file all claims received not later than twelve (12) months from the decedent's date of death. However, filing of claims by the clerk shall not create an inference as to whether the claims are valid or were timely filed. The clerk shall return any claim submitted before the appointment of a personal representative or received more than twelve (12) months from the decedent's date of death.

A creditor who has timely filed a claim against the estate shall file any amendment to its claim no later than thirty (30) days from the later of:

The date an exception to the claim is filed; or

The expiration of the exception period.

Unless the court with jurisdiction over the probate of the decedent's estate grants an extension of time for amendment on the creditor's showing of extraordinary circumstances, any amendment filed after the time prescribed shall be void.

If a claim filed against the decedent's estate is filed by a personal representative of the decedent's estate, the personal representative must provide the clerk of the court with the name and current mailing address of each residuary beneficiary of the decedent's estate at the time the claim is filed.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 2; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.2; Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-510; Acts 1984, ch. 629, § 1; 1985, ch. 140, § 13; 1988, ch. 854, § 8; 1989, ch. 395, § 3; 2005, ch. 99, § 2; 2007, ch. 8, § 1; 2012, ch. 886, §§ 5, 6; 2017, ch. 290, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Suits against representatives, title 30, ch. 2, part 5.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 676, 714, 718, 738, 762, 767, 769, 770, 780, 784, 793, 794, 858, 956, 1070, 1072, 1110.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1001 — 4-1006.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, §§ 35-37, 87, 91, 97, 99; 22 Tenn. Juris., Specific Performance, § 14.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Administration of Estates — Revival of Actions — Time Limitations, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 804 (1969).

Current Problems Facing the Executor Taking the Section 2053 Estate Tax Deduction (Jay D. Christiansen), 30 Vand. L. Rev. 795 (1977).

Decedent's Estates — Bilbrey v. Smithers: Limitations on Post-Death Claims for Purposes of Intestate Succession in Tennessee, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 517 (1997).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

Estate, Gift and Trust Law-Joint and Mutual Wills-Proper Jurisdictional Vehicles for Contract-Based Mutual Wills Claims, 80 Tenn. L. Rev. 883 (2013).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

“The Law of Joint Wills, A Recent Development” (William L. Harbison), 24 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

Value definition clauses: The basics (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

30-2-308. Triplicate copies of pleadings as claims.

Triplicate copies of the first pleading filed in original actions against a personal representative shall be filed with the clerk of the court where the administration originated, to be noted by the clerk in the record of claims as are other claims filed.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.7 (Williams, § 8196.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-511; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 14.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

30-2-309. Statute of limitations arrested by filing claim.

The filing of claims within the time and in the manner provided in §§ 30-2-307 and 30-2-308 shall operate to arrest any statute of limitations applicable to the claims.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-512.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 769.

30-2-310. Limitation on time of filing claims.

All claims and demands not filed with the probate court clerk, as required by §§ 30-2-306 — 30-2-309, or, if later, in which suit has not been brought or revived before the end of twelve (12) months from the date of death of the decedent, shall be forever barred.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), all claims and demands not filed by the state with the probate court clerk, as required by §§ 30-2-306 — 30-2-309, or, if later, in which suit has not been brought or revived before the end of twelve (12) months from the date of death of the decedent, shall be forever barred. This statute of limitations shall not apply to claims for taxes. Claims for state taxes shall continue to be governed by § 67-1-1501.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 3A, as added by Acts 1947, ch. 213, § 2; 1949, ch. 176, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.4 (Williams, § 8196.3a); Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-513; Acts 1989, ch. 395, § 4; 2000, ch. 970, § 1; 2014, ch. 883, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 970, § 2 provided that subsection (b) shall apply to all estates which have not been closed on January 1, 2001, and to all estates which come into existence on or after January 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Actions against personal representative, § 28-3-102.

Revivor of actions, § 30-2-320.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 756, 757, 760, 769.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1002 — 4-1005.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum, (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Administration of Estates — Revival of Actions — Time Limitations, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 804 (1969).

Current Problems Facing the Executor Taking the Section 2053 Estate Tax Deduction (Jay D. Christiansen), 30 Vand. L. Rev. 795 (1977).

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

TennCare: Expanded Estate Recovery - Recover at ALL Cost, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 711 (2015).

30-2-311. Waiver of filing small claims — Payment.

Notwithstanding §§ 30-2-307 — 30-2-310, the personal representative, if in the personal representative's discretion it is deemed proper, may waive the requirement for the filing of and may pay any claim not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) principal amount. If the act of the personal representative in so doing is brought into question, the personal representative will have the burden of showing the validity of the claim so paid.

C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.2; Acts 1979, ch. 90, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-514; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 8.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 782, 940, 956, 986.

Law Reviews.

Administration Under the Small Estates Act (Judge Herschel P. Franks), 14 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 3 (1978).

Current Problems Facing the Executor Taking the Section 2053 Estate Tax Deduction (Jay D. Christiansen), 30 Vand. L. Rev. 795 (1977).

30-2-312. Entry of claim by clerk — Fees — Notice.

Each claim filed with the clerk shall be entered by the clerk in a well bound book, in which the clerk shall set forth the title of the estate, the name and address of the creditor as reflected by the claim filed, the nature and amount of the claim and the date of filing, which book shall be provided and paid for as are other records in the clerk's office. The fees authorized by § 8-21-401(c)(1)(A) shall be paid to the clerk by the claimant at the time such claim is filed. If notice is required to be given to the residuary beneficiary or beneficiaries of the decedent's estate as required by § 30-2-313(b), the claimant shall pay to the clerk on the filing of the claim the fee provided by § 8-21-401(c)(9) for each residuary beneficiary to whom notice is to be given.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.2; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1(38); 1983, ch. 252, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-515; Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 15.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 781.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

30-2-313. Notice of filing claim — Exceptions to claims — Jury trials upon demand.

The clerk of the court, within five (5) days after the filing of a claim and its entry in the claim book as provided in § 30-2-312, shall give written notice to the personal representative and the attorney of record of the filing of the claim, by mailing each a true and correct copy of the claim.

If a personal representative of the decedent's estate files a claim against the estate of the decedent, the clerk of the court, within five (5) days after the filing of a claim and the entry thereof in the claim book as provided in § 30-2-312, shall give written notice to each residuary beneficiary of the decedent's estate of the filing of the claim, by mailing each a true and correct copy of the claim. The notice required by this subsection (b) is in addition to the notice required to be given by subsection (a).

A claim shall not become a final judgment against the estate until after the expiration of the exception period prescribed in § 30-2-314(a).

Should the claimant or the party excepting desire a trial by jury, it shall be demanded by that party in the first claim or exception filed. However, a claimant who has not demanded a jury in the claimant's claim may do so within five (5) days after receipt of notice of the filing of exceptions to the claimant's claim by filing a written demand for a jury with the probate court clerk.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 2; 1947, ch. 137, § 2; 1947, ch. 213, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-516; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 15; 1989, ch. 395, §§ 5, 6; 2017, ch. 290, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added present (b); and redesignated former (b) and (c) as present (c) and (d), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 773, 776, 781.

Law Reviews.

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

30-2-314. Exceptions to claim — Trial by circuit court where jury demanded — Concurrent jurisdiction.

Until thirty (30) days after the expiration of four (4) months from the date of the notice to creditors given as provided in § 30-2-306(b), the personal representative, or any party interested in the estate either as creditor, distributee, heir or otherwise, may except to the claim by filing written exceptions in triplicate with the clerk of the court in which the estate is being administered.

However, if the filing of the claim as permitted by § 30-2-307(a) occurs after the date that is four (4) months from the date of the notice to creditors, the personal representative, or any party interested in the estate either as creditor, distributee, heir or otherwise, may except to any claim by filing written exceptions in triplicate with the clerk of the court in which the estate is being administered; provided, that the exception is filed no later than thirty (30) days from the date the personal representative receives notice from the clerk of the filing of the claim.

Each exception shall include a reasonably detailed explanation of the ground or grounds upon which the person making such exception intends to rely.

Within five (5) days after the filing of exceptions to a claim the clerk shall notify the claimant of the exceptions by mailing the claimant a copy of the exceptions.

If the creditor timely files an amendment as permitted by § 30-2-307(e), the personal representative shall file any exception to the amended claim not later than thirty (30) days from the later of:

The date the amendment is filed with the clerk; or

The expiration of the exception period.

If the claim or the exception filed contains a demand for a trial by jury, or there is a demand as provided in § 30-2-313, the probate court clerk shall certify the claim and the exception to the circuit court for trial by jury upon the issues made by the claim and exception. The claim or exception may be amended in the circuit court, but not so as to avoid the period of limitation upon claims contained in § 30-2-310.

Should no exception be taken to a claim in which a jury trial has been demanded, the claim shall not be certified to the circuit court.

Within five (5) days after an issue triable by a jury has been made, the probate court clerk shall certify all of the papers the clerk has on file relating to that claim to the circuit court, and shall, at the same time, give written notice of the clerk's action to the claimant, the excepting party and the personal representative, and shall thereafter file with the circuit court a statement to this effect, which shall be prima facie evidence that the parties have been notified.

The matter shall be triable at the first term of the circuit court convening five (5) days or more after the certified record has been filed in the circuit court.

On motion of the personal representative or the excepting party, the claimant may be required by the circuit court to make a cost bond, or, in lieu of a bond, take the oath prescribed for poor persons.

After the matter has been certified to the circuit court for trial, it shall be proceeded within that court as in any other law case.

The jury demanded may be waived by the parties and the case tried in the circuit court and on appeal as one in which no jury had been demanded.

If the probate court is a court of record, the probate court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit court to conduct trials of the claim or the exception, all in the same manner and to the same extent as prescribed in this section for circuit courts, except that no certification of the claim or exception shall be required in the absence of any referral to another court.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 3; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; 1947, ch. 213, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.3; Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-517; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 16; 1989, ch. 395, § 7; 1991, ch. 415, § 5; 1992, ch. 951, § 6; 1997, ch. 426, § 6; 2005, ch. 99, § 3; 2005, ch. 429, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Actions against personal representative, § 28-3-102.

Time for payment of claims, § 30-2-319.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 676, 738, 769, 771-774, 776.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-1007, 4-1008.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1353 (1961).

Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1108 (1964).

Wills, Trust and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

30-2-315. Trial of disputed claims where no jury demanded — Appeals — Independent suits, effect.

The clerk shall, within ten (10) days after the filing of exceptions to a claim, in which matter no jury is demanded, as herein provided, fix a date for the hearing thereof by the court, and mail notice of the hearing to the personal representative, to the claimant whose claim has been excepted to, and to the party filing the exception. The date so fixed shall be not less than fifteen (15) days after the date of the mailing of the notice, nor more than eight (8) months after the date of the notice to creditors.

The court shall hear and determine all issues arising upon all the exceptions.

No other pleadings shall be required and the testimony may be taken orally or by deposition.

The court shall assess the costs accruing in consequence of the exceptions in accordance with its discretion, and all costs assessed against the personal representative shall be a proper charge against the estate.

A judgment upon the findings of the court shall be entered in the court and from the judgment an appeal may be perfected within thirty (30) days from the date of entry of the judgment, to the court of appeals or the supreme court, as the case may be. The procedure on appeal shall be governed by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Notwithstanding §§ 30-2-306 — 30-2-314, whenever there is instituted in any other court of competent jurisdiction an independent suit against a personal representative involving liability of the estate, and a claim founded on the same cause of action is or has been filed against the estate in the manner provided in §§ 30-2-307 and 30-2-308, which claim has not been adjudicated by the court in which the administration is pending, the court in which the administration is pending shall hold in abeyance any action on the claim until the final determination of the independent suit, whereupon, on the filing of a certified copy of the final judgment or decree with the clerk of the court in which the administration is pending, that court is authorized to enter judgment accordingly.

This subsection (c) is not intended to deprive the judgment creditor of any other remedy provided by law for the enforcement of the final judgment or decree rendered in the independent suit.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 3A, as added by Acts 1947, ch. 213, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.4 (Williams, § 8196.3a); Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-518; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 17.

Cross-References. Actions against personal representative, § 28-3-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 738, 766, 776, 778, 783, 888.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-1009.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366 (1979).

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, II. Selecting a Proper Forum (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 273 (1979).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman, 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1185 (1965).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

30-2-316. Judgment on claims where no exceptions filed.

After the lapse of ninety (90) days from and after the expiration of the time for entering exceptions to claims filed against the estate, the court may, upon the written application of any creditor having a matured claim on which no independent suit is pending, to whose duly filed claim no exception has been filed as provided in § 30-2-314, enter judgment for the creditor against the estate; provided, that not less than five (5) days' prior written notice of intention to file an application shall be given to the personal representative, stating the time at which the application is to be presented to the court.

C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-519.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 777.

Law Reviews.

Some Aspects of Estate Planning in Tennessee (Alec Brock Stevenson), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 265 (1949).